Washington statutes.
RCW 22.16.030

Extent of appropriation.

Every such corporation shall have the right to appropriate real estate and other property for any or all of the said purposes and under the same procedure as now is or may be hereafter provided by law, in the case of other corporations authorized by the laws of this state to exercise the right of eminent domain.

[ 1919 c 98 s 3; RRS s 11568.]